Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.270

Liability of member for association's debts.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on his or her membership fee or his or her subscription to the capital stock, including any unpaid balance on any promissory note given in payment thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 679; 1959 c 312 s 27.]